Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.260

Fees.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the secretary of state shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW setting:

(a) Fees for:

(i) Filing entity filings;

(ii) Furnishing copies or certified copies of any filed record under this chapter; and

(iii) Furnishing a certificate of existence or registration of an entity, or any other certificate;

(b) License or renewal fees authorized under Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW;

(c) Penalty fees; and

(d) Other miscellaneous charges.

(2) There is no fee for:

(a) A registered agent's consent to act as agent or statement of resignation;

(b) Filing articles of dissolution;

(c) Filing certificates of judicial dissolution;

(d) Filing statements of withdrawal; and

(e) Filing annual reports when submitted concurrently with the payment of annual license fees.

(3) The withdrawal under RCW 23.95.215 of a filed record before it is effective or the correction of a filed record under RCW 23.95.220 does not entitle the person on whose behalf the record was filed to a refund of the filing fee.

(4) The secretary of state shall establish the fee schedule authorized under this section in a manner that is consistent with the fee schedule applicable to the various entities that is in effect on January 1, 2016. The amounts of fees, charges, and penalties established under this section may be no greater than the amounts applicable to entity filings, penalties, and other charges in effect on January 1, 2016. Fees may be adjusted by rule only in an amount that does not exceed the average biennial increase in the cost of providing service. This must be determined in a biennial cost study performed by the secretary of state.

(5) All fees collected by the secretary of state shall be deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to law or deposited in the secretary of state's revolving fund as provided in RCW 43.07.130.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1213.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.